Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to expedite the movement of cattle from producers to the point of slaughter without losing the ownership identity of such cattle, and further to provide for fair and economical methods of identification of cattle in such commercial feed lots.

[ 1979 c 81 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 1.]